Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5350YC (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 237A.13A State child care 1 assistance ââ child care workforce. 2 1. Notwithstanding any provision of section 237A.13 or 3 237A.14 to the contrary, a child shall be eligible for the 4 state child care assistance program established in section 5 237A.13 if a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child meets 6 all of the following requirements, as applicable: 7 a. The parent, guardian, or custodian is employed at a child 8 care facility or child care home that has an agreement with the 9 department to accept reimbursement from the state child care 10 assistance program. 11 b. The parent, guardian, or custodian works in a child 12 care facility or child care home an average minimum of 13 thirty-two hours per week during the month in a position with 14 a primary duty of providing child care directly to children, 15 and is regularly counted in the minimum child-to-staff ratio 16 established by the department by rule. 17 c. (1) If the parent, guardian, or custodian is employed 18 at a child care home or a child development home, the parent, 19 guardian, or custodian does not provide child care to the 20 parentâs, guardianâs, or custodianâs own child. 21 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), a co-provider at 22 a child development home may qualify for state child care 23 assistance if the co-provider meets all requirements specified 24 in this section and by the department by rule. 25 d. The parent, guardian, or custodian is not a substitute or 26 an assistant at a child care home or a child development home. 27 e. Based on the departmentâs evaluation of the parentâs, 28 guardianâs, or custodianâs application for state child care 29 assistance, the department has determined the parent, guardian, 30 or custodian has a need for child care. 31 f. The parent, guardian, or custodian is not the owner of 32 the child care facility or child care home where the parentâs, 33 guardianâs, or custodianâs child is enrolled. 34 2. A director, co-director, or other administrative 35 -1- LSB 5350YC (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 H.F. _____ staff member of a child care facility may qualify for state 1 child care assistance under subsection 1 if such individual 2 is regularly counted in the minimum child-to-staff ratio 3 established by the department by rule. 4 3. A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child participating 5 in the state child care assistance program pursuant to 6 eligibility established under this section shall make 7 copayments as specified by the department by rule. 8 4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 9 to administer this section. 10